District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5207

Limitation of hours of daily service for laborers and mechanics on public works.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 13, 1962, 76 Stat. 360, Pub. L. 87-581, § 203

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3407, 22-3408.